Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART A IN GENERAL
19-2.5-1117. Sentencing - commitment to the department of human services - definitions.

Except as otherwise required in subsection (6) of this section and section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, the court may commit a juvenile to the department of human services for a determinate period of up to two years if the juvenile
is adjudicated for an offense that would constitute a felony or a misdemeanor if committed by an adult; except that, if the juvenile is younger than twelve years of age and is not adjudicated an aggravated juvenile
offender, the court may commit the juvenile to the department of human services only if the juvenile is adjudicated for an offense that would constitute a class 1, class 2, or class 3 felony if committed by an adult.

Any commitment to the department of human services pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or subsection (1)(a) of this section must be followed by a mandatory period of parole of six months, unless the period of parole is extended by the juvenile parole board
pursuant to section 19-2.5-1203 (5).

For purposes of this section:

"Determinate period" is defined in section 19-2.5-102.

"Period of parole" means the period between the parole period start date and the parole period end date as determined by the juvenile parole board. The period of parole applies to both mandatory six-month parole and extended parole pursuant to section
19-2.5-1203 (5). The period of parole continues unless the juvenile is deemed to be on escape status, parole has been suspended pursuant to section 19-2.5-1203, or the juvenile returns to commitment status pursuant
to section 19-2.5-1206. In such circumstances, the period of parole stops until the juvenile has returned to parole status.

A juvenile committed to the department of human services may be placed in the Lookout Mountain school, the Mount View school, or any other training school or facility, or any other disposition may be made that the department may determine as provided
by law.

When a juvenile is committed to the department of human services, the court shall transmit, with the commitment order, a copy of the petition, the order of adjudication, copies of the social study, any clinical or educational reports, and other information
pertinent to the juvenile's care and treatment.

The department of human services shall provide the court with any information concerning a juvenile committed to its care that the court at any time may require.

When a court commits a juvenile to the state department of human services pursuant to this article 2.5, the court shall make the following specific determinations:

Whether placement of the juvenile outside the home would be in the juvenile's and community's best interest; and

Whether reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the juvenile from the home; whether it is reasonable that such efforts are not made because an emergency situation exists that requires the immediate removal of
the juvenile from the home; or whether such efforts are not required because of circumstances described in section 19-1-115 (7).

How to assist in the evaluation of the impact of Colorado's implementation of the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act" on the state's juvenile justice system and make a finding of whether the lack of available and appropriate congregate care
placements is a contributing factor in committing a juvenile to the division of youth services.

If a juvenile is making a transition from the legal custody of a county department of human or social services to commitment with the state department of human services, the court shall conduct a permanency hearing in combination with the sentencing hearing.
The court shall consider multidisciplinary recommendations for sentencing and permanency planning. In conducting such a permanency hearing, the court shall make determinations pursuant to section 19-2.5-1116 (4)(a).

The department of human services shall designate receiving centers for juveniles committed to the department.

If the department of human services makes a change in the designation of a receiving center, it shall notify the juvenile courts at least thirty-five days prior to the date that the change takes effect.

Pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103, commitment of a juvenile to the department of human services must be for a determinate period.

The juvenile court may commit any juvenile adjudicated as an aggravated juvenile offender pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 for an offense other than an offense that would constitute a class 1 or class 2 felony if committed by an adult to the department
of human services for a determinate period of up to five years.

The juvenile court shall commit any juvenile adjudicated as an aggravated juvenile offender pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 for an offense that would constitute a class 2 felony if committed by an adult to the department of human services for a determinate
period of at least three but not more than five years.

The juvenile court shall commit any juvenile adjudicated as an aggravated juvenile offender pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 for an offense that would constitute a class 1 felony if committed by an adult to the department of human services for a determinate
period of at least three but not more than seven years.

The juvenile court may commit any juvenile who is not adjudicated an aggravated juvenile offender pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 but who is adjudicated for an offense that would constitute a felony or a misdemeanor to the department of human services,
and the determinate period of commitment must not exceed two years; except that, if the juvenile is ten or eleven years of age and is not adjudicated an aggravated juvenile offender pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127,
the juvenile may be committed to the department of human services only if the juvenile is adjudicated for an offense that would constitute a class 1, class 2, or class 3 felony if committed by an adult.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (7)(a) is effective until December 31, 2022.] On or before January 1, 2021, the department of human services, in consultation with the juvenile justice reform committee established
pursuant to section 24-33.5-2401 shall develop a length of stay matrix and establish criteria to guide the release of juveniles from a state facility that are based on:

(7)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (7)(a) is effective December 31, 2022.] On or before January 1, 2021, the department of human services, in consultation with the committee on juvenile justice reform established
pursuant to section 24-33.5-2401, as it existed prior to its repeal in 2022, shall develop a length of stay matrix and establish criteria to guide the release of juveniles from a state facility that are based on:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(a)(I) is effective until December 31, 2022.] A juvenile's risk of reoffending, as determined by the results of a validated risk and needs assessment adopted pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(a);

(I)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(a)(I) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
A juvenile's risk of reoffending, as determined by the results of a validated risk and needs assessment adopted pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(a), as it existed prior to its repeal
in 2022;

The seriousness of the offense for which the juvenile was adjudicated delinquent;

The juvenile's progress in meeting treatment goals; and

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(a)(IV) is effective until December 31, 2022.] Other criteria as determined by the department and the juvenile justice reform committee.

(IV)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(a)(IV) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
Other criteria as determined by the department.

In making release and discharge decisions, the department of human services shall use the matrix and release criteria developed pursuant to this subsection (7).

For all hearings and reviews concerning a juvenile who is committed to the department of human services, the entity conducting the hearing or review shall ensure that notice is provided to the juvenile and to any of the following persons with whom the
juvenile is placed:

Foster parents;

Pre-adoptive parents; or

Relatives.

The department of human services may petition the committing court to extend the commitment for an additional period not to exceed two years. The petition must set forth the reasons why it would be in the best interest of the juvenile or the public to
extend the commitment. Upon filing the petition, the court shall set a hearing to determine whether the petition should be granted or denied and shall notify all interested parties.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 651, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
IP(7)(a), (7)(a)(I), and (7)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 22-1211), ch. 79, p. 395, § 9, effective December 31.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former §§ 19-2-909 and 19-2-921 (1), (1.5), (2), (3), (3.3), (3.5), and (4) as they existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act", see Pub.L. 115-123.

19-2.5-1118. Sentencing - persons eighteen years of age or older - county jail - community corrections - definitions.

Except as otherwise required by section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, the court may commit a person eighteen years of age or older but less than twenty-one years of age to the department of human services if the person is adjudicated
a juvenile delinquent for an act committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday or upon revocation of probation.

Except as otherwise required by section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, the court may sentence a person who is eighteen years of age or older on the date of a sentencing hearing to the county jail for a period not to exceed six months
or to a community correctional facility or program for a period not to exceed one year, which may be served consecutively or in intervals, if the person is adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for an act committed prior to the
person's eighteenth birthday.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 654, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-910 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1119. Genetic testing of adjudicated offenders - definitions.

Beginning July 1, 2007, each of the following adjudicated offenders shall submit to collection and a chemical testing of the offender's biological substance sample to determine the offender's genetic markers, unless the offender has already provided a
biological substance sample for such testing pursuant to a statute of this state:

Every offender who, on or after July 1, 2007, is in the custody of the department of human services for a commitment imposed before that date, including an offender on parole, based on adjudication for an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, or
for which the underlying factual basis involved an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior. The department shall collect the sample as soon as possible.

Every offender who, on or after July 1, 2007, is on probation or supervision for a sentence that was imposed before that date, or is on a deferred adjudication that was before that date, for an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior or for which the
factual basis involved an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior. The judicial department shall collect the sample at least thirty-five days prior to the offender's scheduled termination of probation, supervision,
or deferred adjudication.

Every offender who, on or after July 1, 2007, is in a county jail or a community corrections facility for a sentence imposed before that date based on adjudication for an offense that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult. The sheriff or
the community corrections program shall collect the sample at least thirty-five days prior to the offender's release from the custody of the county jail or community corrections facility.

Every offender who, on or after July 1, 2007, is in a county jail or a community corrections facility for a sentence imposed before that date based on adjudication for a misdemeanor offense involving unlawful sexual behavior or for which the factual basis
involved an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior. The sheriff or the community corrections program shall collect the sample at least thirty-five days prior to the offender's release from the custody of the county
jail or community corrections facility.

Every offender sentenced on or after July 1, 2007, for an offense that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult. This subsection (1)(e) does not apply to an offender granted a deferred adjudication, unless otherwise required to submit to a sample
pursuant to this section or unless the deferred adjudication is revoked and a sentence is imposed. The sample must be collected:

From an offender committed to the department of human services, by the department during the intake process but in any event within thirty-five days after the offender is received by the department;

From an offender sentenced to county jail or to community corrections, by the sheriff or by the community corrections program within thirty-five days after the offender is received into the custody of the county jail or the community corrections facility;

From an offender sentenced to probation, by the judicial department within thirty-five days after the offender is placed on probation; and

From an offender who receives any other sentence, by the judicial department within thirty-five days after the offender is sentenced.

Every offender who, on or after July 1, 2007, is sentenced for an adjudication of, or who receives a deferred adjudication for, an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior or for which the underlying factual basis involves unlawful sexual behavior.
The sample must be collected:

From an offender committed to the department of human services, by the department during the intake process but in any event within thirty-five days after the offender is received by the department;

From an offender sentenced to county jail or community corrections, by the sheriff or by the community corrections facility within thirty-five days after the offender is received into the custody of the county jail or the community corrections facility;

From an offender sentenced to probation, by the judicial department within thirty-five days after the offender is placed on probation;

From an offender who receives a deferred adjudication, by the judicial department within thirty-five days after the offender is granted the deferred adjudication; and

From an offender who receives any other sentence, by the judicial department within thirty-five days after the offender is sentenced.

An order for payment toward the cost of care entered by the court pursuant to subsection (1) of this section constitutes a judgment enforceable by the state or the governmental agency that would otherwise incur the cost of care for the juvenile in the
same manner as are civil judgments.

"Adjudicated" means having received a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury or having pled guilty or nolo contendere. Except where otherwise indicated, "adjudicated" does not include deferred adjudication unless the deferred adjudication is revoked and
a sentence is imposed.

"Unlawful sexual behavior" has the same meaning as in section 16-22-102 (9).

The judicial department, the department of human services, a sheriff, or a contractor may:

Use reasonable force to obtain biological substance samples in accordance with this section using medically recognized procedures. In addition, an offender's refusal to comply with this section may be grounds for revocation or denial of parole, probation,
or deferred adjudication.

Collect biological substance samples notwithstanding that the collection was not accomplished within an applicable deadline set forth in this section.

Repealed.

The Colorado bureau of investigation shall conduct the chemical testing of the biological substance samples obtained pursuant to this section. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall file and maintain the results of the chemical testing of biological
samples obtained pursuant to this section and shall furnish the results to a law enforcement agency upon request. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall store and preserve all biological substance samples obtained pursuant
to this section.

A juvenile must not be charged a processing fee for the procurement and analysis of samples described in this section.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 654, § 2, effective October 1; IP(1) and (3)(a) amended, (4) repealed, and (6) added, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3117, § 26, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-925.6 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

19-2.5-1120. Cost of care.

Notwithstanding section 19-1-115 (4)(d), if a juvenile is sentenced to an out-of-home placement or is granted probation as a result of an adjudication, deferral of adjudication, or direct filing in or transfer to district court, the court may order the
juvenile's parent to make payments toward the cost of care only as required pursuant to Title IV of the federal "Social Security Act".

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

and (3) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 656, § 2, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3115 § 24, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-114 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

(2) For Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.

19-2.5-1121. Fees for transporting juveniles.

It is the duty of the sheriff, undersheriff, or deputy, or in their absence any suitable person appointed by the court for such purpose, to convey any juvenile committed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103 or 19-2.5-1127 to facilities of the division of youth
services. All officers performing services pursuant to this part 11 must be paid the same fees as are allowed for similar services in criminal cases, to be paid by the county from which the juvenile was committed.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 657, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-415 as it existed prior to 2021.